North Carolina statutes. Chapter 19A. Protection of Animals.
Article 5A. Animal Shelter Support Fund.

§ 19A-67.
Animal Shelter Support Fund.

Creation. — The Animal Shelter Support Fund is established as a special fund in the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. The Fund consists of appropriations by the General Assembly or contributions and grants from public or private sources.

Use. — The Fund shall be used by the Animal Welfare Section of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services to provide grants to local governments for expenses related to their operation of a registered animal shelter due to any of the following:

The denial, suspension, or revocation of the shelter’s registration, or compliance with applicable requirements of the Animal Welfare Act or rules adopted by the Board of Agriculture implementing that Act.

An unforeseen catastrophic disaster at an animal shelter.

Rules. — The Board of Agriculture shall issue rules detailing eligible expenses and application guidelines that comply with the requirements of this Article.

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 10.5B, effective July 1, 2021.

History.

2015-241, s. 13.7(b); 2016-113, s. 6(a); 2021-180, s. 10.5B.

§ 19A-68.
Grants to counties and cities from Animal Shelter Support Fund.

Eligible Costs. — Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, governments eligible for distributions from the Animal Shelter Support Fund may receive funding only for the direct operational costs of the animal shelter following an event described in

G.S. 19A-67(b)

. For purposes of this subsection, direct operational costs shall include veterinary services, sanitation services and needs, animal sustenance and supplies, and temporary housing and sheltering. Counties and cities shall not receive funding for administrative costs or capital expenditures for facilities and equipment, unless those costs are required to comply with the Animal Welfare Act or rules adopted by the Board of Agriculture implementing that Act.

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 10.5B, effective July 1, 2021.

Application. — A county or city eligible for a grant from the Animal Shelter Support Fund shall apply to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. The application shall be submitted in the form required by the Department and shall include an itemized listing of the costs for which funding is sought.

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 10.5B, effective July 1, 2021.

Limitation. — Grants from the Animal Shelter Support Fund are limited to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per grantee in any fiscal year.

History.

2015-241, s. 13.7(b); 2021-180, s. 10.5B.

§ 19A-69.
Report.

The Department shall report annually to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources and the Fiscal Research Division no later than March 1. The report shall contain information regarding all revenues and expenditures of the Animal Shelter Support Fund.

History.

2015-241, s. 13.7(b); 2020-78, s. 5.1(b).